Washington statutes.
RCW 15.65.243

When director appoints majority of the board—Nominations—Advisory vote—Notice—Director selects either of two candidates receiving the most votes.

(1) This section applies when the director appoints a majority of the board positions as set forth under RCW 15.65.220(3).

(2) Candidates for director-appointed board positions on a commodity board shall be nominated under RCW 15.65.250.

(3) The director shall cause an advisory vote to be held for the director-appointed positions. Not less than ten days in advance of the vote, advisory ballots shall be mailed to all producers or handlers entitled to vote, if their names appear upon the list of affected parties or affected producers or handlers, whichever is applicable. Notice of every advisory vote for board membership shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation within the affected area defined in the order or agreement not less than ten days in advance of the date of the vote. The advisory ballot shall be conducted in a manner so that it is a secret ballot. The names of the two candidates receiving the most votes in the advisory vote shall be forwarded to the director for potential appointment to the board. In the event there are only two candidates nominated for a board position, an advisory vote may not be held and the candidates' names shall be forwarded to the director for potential appointment.

(4) The candidates whose names are forwarded to the director for potential appointment shall submit to the director a letter stating why the candidate wishes to be appointed to the board. The director may select either person for the position.

[ 2011 c 103 s 18; 2002 c 313 s 24.]

NOTES:

Purpose—2011 c 103: See note following RCW 15.26.120.

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.